Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-404 Notice. (a) A copy of the
petition and the notice of hearing on a petition for conservatorship or other
protective order shall be served personally on the respondent if the respondent
has attained fourteen years of age, but if the respondent's whereabouts is
unknown or personal service cannot be made, service on the respondent shall be
made by certified or registered mail or by publication pursuant to section
560:1-401(a)(3). The notice shall include a statement that the respondent must
be physically present unless excused by the court, inform the respondent of the
respondent's rights at the hearing, and, if the appointment of a conservator is
requested, include a description of the nature, purpose, and consequences of an
appointment. A failure to serve the respondent with a notice substantially
complying with this subsection precludes the court from granting the petition.

(b) In a proceeding to establish a
conservatorship or for another protective order, notice of the hearing shall be
given to the persons listed in the petition. Failure to give notice under this
subsection does not preclude the appointment of a conservator or the making of
another protective order.

(c) Notice of the hearing on a petition for an
order after appointment of a conservator or making of another protective order,
together with a copy of the petition, shall be given to the protected person,
if the protected person has attained fourteen years of age and is not missing,
detained, or unable to return to the United States, any conservator of the
protected person's estate, and any other person as ordered by the court.

(d) A conservator shall give notice of the
filing of the conservator's inventory or report, together with a copy of the
inventory or report to the protected person and any other person the court
directs. The notice shall be delivered or sent within fourteen days after the
filing of the inventory or report. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next